Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1629.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 34PUBLIC WORKER SAFETY AND PROTECTIONSec.3401. Definitions.3402. Workplace violence prevention policies.3403. Training requirements.3404. Incident reporting and worker support.3405. Data collection and oversight.3406. Enforcement and penalties.§ 3401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employer." A public entity or agency employing outdoor public workers."Outdoor public worker." A public employee whose duties regularly place the employee in outdoor, public or nontraditional workplace environments, including, but not limited to, sanitation workers, crossing guards, utility workers, code enforcement officers, park maintenance staff, transportation workers, county assistance workers and other similar roles designated by regulation."Violence." Any act or threat of physical force, harassment, verbal abuse, intimidation or assault directed at an employee during the performance of the duties of the employee.§ 3402. Workplace violence prevention policies.(a) Plan.--Each employer shall adopt and implement a written workplace violence prevention plan tailored to the risks faced by outdoor public workers. The plan shall include:(1) Procedures for identifying and assessing risk factors associated with specific work environments.(2) Methods for reducing risk, including, but not limited to, staffing protocols, route planning, use of surveillance equipment and communications systems.(3) Incident reporting and investigation procedures.(4) Protocols for emergency response and coordination with eligible community organizations or employers and law enforcement.(5) Regular reviews and updates of prevention strategies.(b) Review.--Employers shall review, at least quarterly, 20250HB1629PN1970 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 workplace violence incident reporting data, including reviewing for patterns in type of incident, type of work, type of outdoor public worker, location, timing and other commonalities between incidents, and adapt the workplace violence prevention plans as needed to reduce incidents.(c) Threat assessments and safety team.--Employers shall, at least twice annually, conduct risk and threat assessments at work sites to further develop the risk management strategy of the employer. Employers shall create a safety team or teams consisting of individuals who are familiar with the unique conditions, challenges and other factors relating to each unique outdoor public worker role in order to create and update risk management strategies that are appropriate for each role.(d) Consultation.--Employers shall consult with employee representatives or unions during the development and implementation of the plan.§ 3403. Training requirements.(a) Mandatory training.--All outdoor public workers shall receive mandatory training on workplace violence prevention, including:(1) Recognizing signs of aggression or potential violence.(2) Deescalation techniques.(3) Procedures for safely disengaging and seeking assistance.(4) Legal rights and responsibilities.(5) Procedures for reporting incidents and accessing support services.(b) Requirements.--Training shall be:(1) Conducted within 30 days of hire.20250HB1629PN1970 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Refreshed at least every two years or upon request.(3) Delivered in formats accessible to workers of varied literacy and language backgrounds.§ 3404. Incident reporting and worker support.(a) Reporting system.--Employers shall establish a confidential and accessible reporting system for all incidents or threats of violence.(b) Worker support.--Outdoor public workers shall be provided:(1) Paid administrative leave for medical or psychological recovery following documented incidents of violence and for any court appearances necessary related to such incident or incidents.(2) Access to counseling or Employee Assistance Programs.(3) Legal support when testifying or pressing charges related to a work-related assault or threat.§ 3405. Data collection and oversight.(a) Records.--Employers shall maintain records of all reported incidents of violence against outdoor public workers, including the nature of the incident, time, location and response measures taken.(b) Oversight.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency shall:(1) Aggregate data annually and submit a report to the General Assembly.(2) Monitor compliance and recommend best practices.(3) Establish a grant program for local government units to improve safety infrastructure and training for public outdoor workers.20250HB1629PN1970 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 3406. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Fines and corrective action.--Employers who fail to implement the requirements of this chapter shall be subject to administrative fines and required to submit a corrective action plan.(b) Retaliation.--Employees who are retaliated against for reporting incidents or participating in training shall have recourse under State labor and employment protections.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1629PN1970 - 5 - 123456789